Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-502
Organization; petition; contents; territory included.

Such petition shall contain a definite description of the territory intended to be embraced in such district according to government survey, and the name of the proposed district; but no lands not included within any municipal corporation, or within three miles thereof, shall be included in any sanitary district, nor shall any lands not within an incorporated town be included within any sanitary district, unless the same be within three miles of the channel of such stream or of the area of lands subject to its overflow.

Laws 1891, c. 36, § 1, p. 287;

R.S.1913, § 1923;

C.S.1922, § 1864;

C.S.1929, § 31-602;

R.S.1943, § 31-502.